Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB188.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.557 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as in KRS
314.011;
(b) "Children's advocacy center" has the same meaning as in KRS 620.020;
(c) "Child medical evaluation" means an examination at a children's advocacy
center to evaluate for child physical abuse, sexual abuse, or neglect and to
exclude other etiologies and evaluate the health and well-being of the child. A
child medical evaluation shall include but not be limited to one (1) or more of
the following:
1. A medical history taken from the child and a nonimplicated parent,
guardian, or primary caretaker;
2. A comprehensive physical examination;
3. Laboratory services;
4. Photo documentation;
5. Follow-up evaluation; or
6. A mental health screening to determine the impact of the alleged abuse
on the mental health status of the child and the need for mental health
services;
(d) "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.550; and
(e) "Sexual assault nurse examiner" has the same meaning as in KRS 314.011.
(2) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services and any managed care organization or
other entity with which[whom] the Department for Medicaid Services contracts for
the delivery of Medicaid services shall provide Medicaid reimbursement for a child
medical evaluation provided by a licensed physician, advanced practice registered
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:37 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1825
nurse, or sexual assault nurse examiner employed or contracted by a children's
advocacy center if the children's advocacy center is in compliance with the
appropriate and necessary federal and state laws or regulations.
(3) Child medical evaluations provided by a licensed physician, advanced practice
registered nurse, or sexual assault nurse examiner in a children's advocacy center
shall be reimbursed by the Department for Medicaid Services at the true and actual
cost of the child medical evaluation.
(4) The Department for Medicaid Services shall apply for any waivers of federal laws
or regulations necessary to implement this section.
(5) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/14/2025 9:37 AM Jacketed